Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB400.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 519.070 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of tampering with a prisoner monitoring device when he or she
intentionally alters, disables, deactivates, tampers with, removes, damages, or
destroys any:
(a) Device used to facilitate electronic monitoring or supervision of a person who
is on probation or parole, or has been ordered to wear a device as a condition
of pretrial release; or
(b) Video recording or video monitoring device within a correctional facility.
(2) Tampering with a prisoner monitoring device is a Class D felony.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 2/6/2025 1:12 PM Jacketed